Utah statutes.
31A-22-202.   Protection of third-party claimants.

No insurance contract insuring against loss or damage through legal liability for the bodily injury or death by accident of any person, or for damage to the property of any person may be retroactively abrogated to the detriment of any third-party claimant by any agreement between the insurer and insured after the occurrence of any injury, death, or damage for which the insured may be liable.  This attempted abrogation is void.

